Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 11 Fire Protection Sprinkler Contractors

25-11-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Fire Sprinkler Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 25.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and Regulations for Enforcement of the Georgia Fire Sprinkler, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Comptroller General, Chapter 120-3-19.

25-11-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Certificate” or “certificate of competency” means the document issued by the Commissioner to a certificate holder who has demonstrated adequate technical knowledge and ability to design in accordance with recognized standards as adopted by the Commissioner and to perform and supervise the installation, repair, alteration, addition, maintenance, or inspection of water-based fire protection systems.

“Certificate holder” means an individual who has been issued a certificate of competency by the Commissioner.

“Commissioner” means the Georgia Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Fire protection sprinkler contractor” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or joint venture that supervises, performs, or supervises and performs the installation, repair, alteration, addition, maintenance, or inspection of water-based fire protection systems. Such term does not include local building officials, fire inspectors, or insurance inspectors when acting in their official capacities.

“Fire protection sprinkler contractor license” means the document issued by the Commissioner to the fire protection sprinkler contractor which authorizes the fire protection sprinkler contractor to engage in the business of fabrication, installation, repair, alteration, maintenance, or inspection of water-based fire protection systems.

“Fire protection sprinkler system” means an integrated system of overhead and underground piping designed in accordance with fire protection engineering standards. The installation includes one or more automatic water supplies. The portion of the system aboveground is a network of specially sized or hydraulically designed piping installed in a building, structure, or area, generally overhead, to which sprinklers are attached in a systematic pattern. The valve controlling each system riser is located in the system riser or its supply piping. The system is usually activated by heat from a fire and discharges water over the fire area.

“Fire protection system designer” means a person who develops documents pertaining to water-based fire protection systems.

“Fire protection system designer license” means a document issued by the Commissioner which authorizes the fire protection system designer to engage in the business of producing construction shop drawings pertaining to water-based fire protection systems.

“Fire protection system inspector” means an individual who performs inspections only on water-based fire protection systems in accordance with applicable codes and standards as adopted by the Commissioner. Such term does not apply to state, local, and insurance inspectors while acting in their official capacities.

“Fire protection system inspector’s license” means a document issued by the Commissioner which authorizes the fire protection system inspector to engage in the business of inspecting water-based fire protection systems.

“Fire pump” means a pump supplying water at the flow and pressure required by water-based fire protection systems.

“Foam-water spray system” means a special system pipe connected to a source of foam concentrate and to a water supply and equipped with foam-water spray nozzles for fire protection agent discharge (foam and water sequentially in that order or in reverse order) and distribution over the area to be protected. System operation arrangements parallel those for foam-water sprinkler systems.

“Foam-water sprinkler system” means a special system pipe connected to a source of foam concentrates and to a water supply and equipped with appropriate discharge devices for fire protection agent discharge and distribution over the area to be protected. The piping system is connected to the water supply through a control valve that is usually actuated by operation of automatic detection equipment installed in the same area as the sprinklers. When this valve opens, water flows into the piping system, and foam concentrate is injected into the water. The resulting foam solution discharging through the discharge devices generates and distributes foam. Upon exhaustion of the foam concentrate supply, water discharge will follow the foam and continue until manually shut off. Existing deluge sprinkler systems that have been converted to the use of aqueous film forming foam are classified as foam-water sprinkler systems.

“Inspection” means a visual examination of a water-based fire protection system or portion thereof to verify that it appears to be in operating condition and is free of physical damage.

“Maintenance” means work performed to keep equipment operable or to make repairs without altering the operation of the water-based system.

“Private fire service main” means that pipe and its appurtenances on private property that are:

Between a source of water and the base of the system riser for water-based fire protection systems;

Between a source of water and inlets to foam-making systems;

Between a source of water and the base elbow of private hydrants or monitor nozzles;

Used as fire pump suction and discharge piping outside of a building; and

Beginning at the inlet side of the check valve on a gravity or pressure tank.

“Private water tank” means a tank supplying water for water-based fire protection systems which is located on private property.

“Standpipe system” means an arrangement of piping, valves, hose connections, and allied equipment installed in a building or structure with the hose connections located in such a manner that water can be discharged in streams or spray patterns through attached hoses and nozzles for the purpose of extinguishing a fire, thus protecting a building or structure, its contents, and its occupants. This is accomplished by connection to water supply systems or by pumps, tanks, and other equipment necessary to provide an adequate supply of water-to-hose connections.

“Testing” means a procedure to determine the status of a system as intended by conducting periodic physical checks on water-based fire protection systems such as waterflow tests, fire pump tests, alarm tests, and trip tests of dry pipe, deluge, or preaction valves. These tests follow up on the original acceptance test at intervals specified in the appropriate standards related to such systems.

“Water-based fire protection system” means any one system or any combination of a number of systems designed to deliver water to an apparatus designed to extinguish or retard the advancement of fire. Such systems include fire protection sprinkler systems, standpipe systems, private fire service mains, fire pumps, private water tanks, water spray fixed systems, foam-water spray systems, and foam-water sprinkler systems. The term “fire sprinkler system” is used interchangeably with this term.

“Water-spray fixed system” means a special fixed pipe system connected to a reliable fire protection water supply and equipped with water-spray nozzles for specific water discharge and distribution over the surface or area to be protected. The piping system is connected to the water supply through an automatically or manually activated valve that initiates the flow of water. An automatic valve is actuated by operation of automatic detection equipment installed in the same area as the water-spray nozzles.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1124, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.

25-11-3.
Powers and duties of the Commissioner; delegation of authority.

The Commissioner is charged with the duty and responsibility for the enforcement of this chapter.

Any authority, power, or duty vested in the Commissioner by any provision of this chapter may be exercised, discharged, or performed by any deputy, assistant, or other designated employee acting in the Commissioner’s name and by his or her delegated authority.

The Commissioner may, at his or her discretion, have the competency and license test prepared by others.

The Commissioner is authorized to enter into a reciprocal agreement with the state fire commissioner or state fire marshal of other states for the waiver of the competency test of any applicant resident in such other jurisdiction, provided that:

The laws of the other jurisdiction are substantially similar to this chapter; and

The applicant has no place of business within this state nor is an officer, director, stockholder, or partner in any corporation or partnership doing business in this jurisdiction as a fire protection sprinkler contractor.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 824, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “state fire commissioner” was substituted for “State Fire Commissioner” in the introductory language of subsection (d).

25-11-4.
Application to become certificate holder; certificate fee; demonstration of applicant’s competence and knowledge; limitations on issuance of certificate; expiration and renewal of certificate.

Any individual desiring to become a certificate holder shall submit to the Commissioner a completed application on forms prescribed by the Commissioner. Such individual shall remit with his or her application a nonrefundable certificate fee of $150.00 plus a one-time filing fee of $75.00. Such fee shall not be prorated for portions of a year.

Prior to obtaining a certificate, the applicant shall demonstrate his or her competence and knowledge of water-based fire protection systems by:

Successfully completing a competency test by means prescribed by rules and regulations as adopted and promulgated by the Commissioner; or

Submitting to the Commissioner a certification from either the state fire commissioner or state fire marshal of another jurisdiction whenever a reciprocal agreement has been entered into between the two jurisdictions pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If the applicant has paid the required fees and has met one of the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section, the Commissioner shall issue a certificate of competency in the name of the applicant, unless such applicant has been cited under other provisions of this chapter. Such certificate shall expire annually as determined by the rules and regulations and shall be nontransferable.

In no case shall a certificate holder be allowed to obtain a certificate of competency for more than one fire protection sprinkler contractor or more than one office location at a time. If the certificate holder should leave the employment of a fire protection sprinkler contractor or change office locations, he or she must notify the Commissioner in writing within 30 days.

A certificate holder desiring to renew his or her certificate shall submit a renewal application to the Commissioner and remit therewith a renewal fee of $100.00 on or before the date determined by the rules and regulations of each year. If the state minimum fire safety standards regarding the installation or maintenance of fire protection sprinkler systems or water-spray systems promulgated by the Commissioner have been revised since the date the certificate holder’s expiring certificate was issued, the Commissioner may, upon 30 days’ notice, require the certificate holder to again meet one of the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section prior to the renewal of his or her certificate.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 824, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1124, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-52/HB 1055.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “state fire commissioner” was substituted for “state fire Commissioner” in paragraph (b)(2).

25-11-5.
Licensing of each location; application; fee; prerequisites.

Where a fire protection sprinkler contractor has multiple office locations for the purpose of design, installation, repair, alteration, addition, maintenance, or inspection of water-based fire protection systems, each location shall be licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

Any organization or individual desiring to become a fire protection sprinkler contractor shall submit to the Commissioner a completed application on forms prescribed by him or her. Such organization or individual shall remit with his or her application a nonrefundable license fee of $100.00 plus a one-time filing fee of $75.00. Such fee shall not be prorated for portions of a year.

Prior to obtaining a sprinkler contractor’s license, the applicant shall:

Submit to the Commissioner a copy of any and all certificate of competency holders’ certificates employed by the applicant; and

Submit to the Commissioner proof of comprehensive liability insurance coverage. The liability insurance policy shall provide coverage in an amount not less than $1 million and shall cover any loss to property or personal injury caused by the fire protection sprinkler contractor. The policy must be purchased from an insurer authorized to do business in Georgia.

A fire protection sprinkler contractor license shall expire annually as determined by the rules and regulations. A license holder desiring to renew his or her license shall submit a renewal application to the Commissioner and remit a renewal fee of $75.00 on or before the date determined by the rules and regulations of each year.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-53/HB 1055.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1, effective July 1, 1997, renumbered former Code Section 25-11-5 as present Code Section 25-11-8.

25-11-6.
Inspector’s license.

Any individual desiring to become a fire protection sprinkler system inspector shall submit to the Commissioner a completed application on the prescribed forms. Such individual shall remit with his or her application a nonrefundable license fee of $100.00 plus a one-time filing fee of $75.00. Such fees shall not be prorated for portions of a year.

Prior to obtaining a license, the applicant shall demonstrate his or her competence and employment by a sprinkler contractor by:

Successfully completing a competency test by means prescribed by rules and regulations as adopted and promulgated by the Commissioner; and

Submitting to the Commissioner proof of employment by a sprinkler contractor who has comprehensive liability insurance coverage. The liability insurance policy shall provide coverage in an amount not less than $1 million and shall cover any loss to property or personal injury caused by the fire protection sprinkler inspector. The policy must be purchased from an insurer authorized to do business in Georgia.

A fire protection sprinkler system inspector license shall expire annually as determined by the rules and regulations. A license holder desiring to renew his or her license shall submit a renewal application to the Commissioner and remit a renewal fee of $75.00 on or before the date determined by the rules and regulations of each year.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-54/HB 1055.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1, effective July 1, 1997, renumbered former Code Section 25-11-6 as present Code Section 25-11-12.

25-11-7.
Fire protection system designer license.

Any individual desiring to become a fire protection system designer shall submit to the Commissioner a completed application on forms prescribed by the Commissioner. Such individual shall remit with his or her application a nonrefundable license fee of $100.00 plus a one-time filing fee of $75.00. Such fee shall not be prorated for portions of a year.

Prior to obtaining a license, the applicant shall demonstrate his or her competence and knowledge of water-based fire protection systems by means prescribed by rules and regulations as adopted and promulgated by the Commissioner or as set forth in Chapter 15 of Title 43.

A fire protection system designer license shall expire annually as determined by the rules and regulations. A license holder desiring to renew his or her license shall submit a renewal application to the Commissioner and remit a renewal fee of $75.00 on or before the date determined by the rules and regulations of each year.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 25; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-55/HB 1055.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1, effective July 1, 1997, renumbered former Code Section 25-11-7 as present Code Section 25-11-13.

25-11-8.
Requirement that installation, repair, or other work be performed or supervised by certificate holder.

No person shall act as a fire protection sprinkler contractor unless a certificate holder is employed full time, in office or on site or combination thereof, to supervise or perform the installation, repair, alteration, addition, maintenance, or inspection of water-based fire protection systems.

If the only certificate holder employed by a fire protection sprinkler contractor leaves the employment of the fire protection contractor, the contractor shall notify the Commissioner in writing within 30 days. A new certificate holder must be employed by a fire protection sprinkler contractor within 30 days of such notice.

No fire protection sprinkler contractor shall permit any person under his or her employment or control to install, repair, alter, maintain, or inspect any water-based fire protection system unless such person is a certificate holder or is under the direct supervision of a certificate holder employed by the contractor.

Only fire protection sprinkler contractors or certificate of competency holders shall alter or renovate water-based fire protection systems except as otherwise provided by this chapter.

Individuals employed by the building owner or a representative of the building owner may repair leaks, replace broken fittings, or perform other routine maintenance that does not alter the piping arrangement or operation of a water-based fire protection system.

Installations shall conform to codes as adopted by the Commissioner unless otherwise permitted by this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

It shall be unlawful for any person to begin installation of a fire sprinkler system on any proposed or existing building or structure which comes under the classification in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-2-13 or which comes under the jurisdiction of the office of the Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to Code Section 25-2-12 without first having drawings of the designed system approved by the appropriate authority having jurisdiction unless otherwise provided by the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-11-8

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 25/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language in subsection (g).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1, effective July 1, 1997, renumbered former Code Section 25-11-8 as present Code Section 25-11-14.

25-11-9.
Review of water-based fire protection shop drawings.

Water-based fire protection shop drawings shall be reviewed for code compliance with the state minimum standards by a certificate of competency holder.

The reviewing certificate holder’s signature, printed name, and certificate number indicating such compliance shall be indicated on submitted plans.

Noncode compliance dictated by bid documents shall be reported by means prescribed by the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1, effective July 1, 1997, renumbered former Code Section 25-11-9 as present Code Section 25-11-15.

25-11-10.
Preparation of water-based fire protection system documents for construction by designers.

Only licensed fire protection system designers or other designers under their direct supervision shall prepare water-based fire protection system documents for construction.

All documents shall be representative of code complying water-based fire protection systems unless otherwise permitted by the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

The licensed fire protection system designer’s signature, printed name, and license number shall be indicated on the shop drawings.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, §
1, effective July 1, 1997, renumbered former Code Section 25-11-10 as present Code Section 25-11-16.

25-11-11.
Individuals authorized to inspect and maintain systems.

Inspections, maintenance, and testing required by this chapter shall only be performed by licensed fire protection system inspectors, certificate of competency holders, or representatives of the building owner. Representatives of the building owner shall indicate in writing to the authority having jurisdiction their intent to do such inspections and provide to the authority having jurisdiction proof of knowledge and expertise pertaining to the systems inspected as specified in the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. Said representatives of the building owner are exempt from the license requirements specified in Code Section 25-11-6.

Duly authorized manufacturers’ representatives while acting in their official capacities are exempt from this chapter.

Inspections and maintenance of water-based fire protection systems owned by a firm, business, or corporation and installed on property under control of the firm, business, or corporation may be performed by an employee of the firm, business, or corporation provided annual inspection and maintenance of the water-based system are performed by a current certificate of competency holder or inspector as defined in this chapter. Said employees are exempt from the license requirements specified in Code Section 25-11-6.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1, effective July 1, 1997, renumbered former Code Section 25-11-11 as present Code Section 25-11-19.

25-11-12.
Rules and regulations; forms.

The Commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations as he or she deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The Commissioner may also prescribe the forms required for the administration of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-11-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.

25-11-13.
Valid license required for installation or repair of water-based fire protection sprinkler systems; proof of contractor’s competency required; effect of chapter on laws regulating contractors’ work.

The installation or repair of any underground facilities or piping which connects to and furnishes water for the water-based fire protection system shall be performed only by a licensed utility contractor, fire protection sprinkler contractor, or licensed plumber in accordance with the minimum fire safety standards adopted by the Commissioner. The installing contractor shall be responsible for the installation of proper underground facilities and piping which provide an adequate flow of water from the fire protection water supply to the water-based fire protection system.

Evidence of inspection shall be given to the owner or his or her representative in the form of a letter indicating the inspector or certificate of competency holder and the license number or certificate number.

Before any local building official shall issue any license or building permit which authorizes the construction of any building or structure containing a water-based fire protection system, such local official shall require a copy of a valid fire protection sprinkler contractor license from the fire protection sprinkler contractor. The fire protection sprinkler contractor shall be required to pay any fees normally imposed for local licenses or permits, but the local official shall impose no requirements on the fire protection sprinkler contractor to prove competency other than proper evidence of a valid certificate of competency, as issued by the Commissioner.

Nothing in this chapter limits the power of a municipality, county, or the state to require the submission and approval of plans and specifications or to regulate the quality and character of work performed by contractors through a system of permits, fees, and inspections otherwise authorized by law for the protection of the public health and safety.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1317, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-11-13

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.

25-11-14.
Applicability to work performed for state or political subdivision; contract and bid requirements for such work.

This chapter shall also apply to any fire protection sprinkler contractor performing work for the state or any municipality, county, or other political subdivision. Officials of the state or any municipality, county, or other political subdivision are required to determine compliance with this chapter before awarding any contracts for the installation, repair, alteration, addition, maintenance, or inspection of a water-based fire protection system. Bids tendered for such contracts shall be accompanied by a copy of a valid certificate of competency.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-11-14

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.

25-11-15.
Deposit of fees collected under chapter; authority to accept grants for administration of chapter.

All fees collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited with the Fiscal Division of the Department of Administrative Services.

The Commissioner shall be authorized to receive grants for the administration of this chapter from parties interested in upgrading and improving the quality of water-based fire protection systems, education of the public pertaining to water-based fire protection systems, or the upgrading of fire protection, in general, in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Code 1981, §

25-11-15

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.

25-11-16.
Cease and desist order against violators; penalty for violations; order requiring compliance; revocation of certificate for failure to comply with order; civil actions.

Whenever the Commissioner shall have reason to believe that any individual is or has been violating any provisions of this chapter, the Commissioner, his or her deputy, his or her assistant, or other designated persons may issue and deliver to the individual an order to cease and desist such violation. An order issued under this Code section may be delivered in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section.

Violation of any provision of this chapter or failure to comply with a cease and desist order is cause for revocation of any or all certificates and licenses issued by the Commissioner for a period of not less than six months and not to exceed five years. If a new certificate or license has been issued to the person so charged, the order of revocation shall operate effectively with respect to such new certificates and licenses held by such person. In the case of an applicant for a license, certificate, or permit, violation of any provision of this title or regulations promulgated thereunder may constitute grounds for refusal of the application. Decisions under this subsection may be appealed as provided by law.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty imposed by the Commissioner of not more than $1,000.00 for a first offense, not less than $1,000.00 and not more than $2,000.00 for a second offense, and not less than $2,000.00 or more than $5,000.00 for a third or subsequent offense. Prior to subjecting any person or entity to a fine under this subsection, the Commissioner or his or her agent shall give written notice to the person or entity by hand delivery or by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, of the existence of the violations. After a reasonable period of time after notice is given, an order may be issued based on this Code section. Such order must be delivered in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section and must notify the person or entity of the right to a hearing with respect to same.

Any order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter shall contain or be accompanied by a notice of opportunity for hearing which may provide that a hearing will be held if and only if a person subject to the order requests a hearing within ten days of receipt of the order and notice. The order and notice shall be served by delivery by the Commissioner or his or her agent or by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested. Any person who fails to comply with any order under this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be punished by law.

In addition to other powers granted to the Commissioner under this chapter, the Commissioner may bring a civil action to enjoin a violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1124, § 2; Code 1981, §

25-11-16

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 25; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2014, p. 385, § 1/SB 325.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added the last sentence in subsection (a); added the next to the last sentence in subsection (b); in subsection (c), in the first sentence, inserted “any provision” near the beginning and deleted “for each day a violation persists after such person is notified of the Commissioner’s intent to impose such penalty and the right to a hearing with respect to same” from the end, and added the last three sentences; inserted “issued by the Commissioner under this chapter” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (d); and added subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to subsection (d) is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

25-11-17.
Additional grounds for revocation, suspension, refusal, or nonrenewal of licenses.

In addition to the grounds set forth in Code Section 25-11-16, it is cause for revocation or suspension, refusal, or nonrenewal of certificates or licenses by the Commissioner if it is determined that the holder or applicant has:

Rendered inoperative a water-based fire protection system covered by this chapter, except during a reasonable time during which the system is being repaired, altered, added to, maintained, inspected, or except pursuant to a court order;

Falsified any record required to be maintained by this chapter or rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter or current fire codes enforced by the Commissioner;

Improperly installed, repaired, serviced, modified, altered, inspected, or tested a water-based fire protection system;

While holding a certificate or license, allowed another person to use the certificate or license or certificate number or license number other than his or her own valid certificate or license or certificate number or license number;

While holding a certificate or license, used a certificate or license or certificate number or license number other than his or her own valid certificate or license or certificate number or license number;

Used credentials, methods, means, or practices to impersonate a representative of the Commissioner or the state fire marshal or any local fire chief, fire marshal, or other fire authority having jurisdiction;

Failed to maintain the minimum insurance coverage as set forth in this chapter;

Failed to obtain, retain, or maintain one or more of the qualifications and requirements to obtain a certificate of competency or other licenses required by this chapter;

Installed, serviced, modified, altered, inspected, maintained, added to, or tested a water-based fire protection system without a current, valid license or certificate, when such license or certificate is required by this chapter;

Made a material misstatement or misrepresentation or committed a fraud in obtaining or attempting to obtain a license or certificate; or

Failed to notify the Commissioner, in writing, with 30 days after a change of residence, principal business address, or name.

In addition to other grounds set forth in this Code section, the Commissioner shall not issue a new license or certificate if the Commissioner finds that the circumstance or circumstances for which the license or certificate was previously suspended or revoked still exist or are likely to recur.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 385, § 2/SB 325.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph, inserted “, refusal, or nonrenewal” and “or applicant”; substituted “inspected, or except pursuant to a court order” for “or inspected” at the end of paragraph (1); deleted “or” at the end of paragraph (7); substituted present paragraph (8) for former paragraph (8), which read: “Failed to maintain the minimum requirements to obtain a certificate of competency or other licenses;”; and added paragraphs (9) through (11) and the ending undesignated paragraph.

25-11-18.
Failure to renew certificate or license.

The failure to renew a certificate or license by the expiration date as set forth in this chapter will cause the certificate or license to become inoperative. A certificate or license which is inoperative because of the failure to renew it shall be restored upon payment of the applicable fee plus a penalty of not more than $250.00 if said fees are paid within 90 days of expiration. After 90 days new certificates and licenses must be applied for as required for an initial certificate or license.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.

25-11-19.
Systems exempt from chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to water-based automatic sprinkler systems for use in single-family dwellings or limited water-based systems permitted to be connected directly to a domestic water supply system as allowed by the NFiPA Life Safety Code adopted by the Commissioner’s rules and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-11-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1212, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-11-19

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1698, § 1.